Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1414.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin KIDS IN NEED FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Kids in Need Foundation, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit corporation, to acquire property for a school supply distribution and educator resource center in the city of Little Canada to support underserved students and teachers throughout Minnesota. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end